Kentucky, session 2025RS, HB534.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
SECTION 1. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 383 IS CREATED TO
READ AS FOLLOWS:
(1) On or after the effective date of this Act, in proceedings for forcible entry or
detainer, if the case is dismissed, the court shall order the record expunged upon
the expiration of five (5) days. The order expunging the records shall not require
any action by the respondent.
(2) After the expungement, the proceedings in the matter shall be deemed never to
have occurred. The court and other agencies shall delete or remove the records
from their computer systems so that any official state-performed background
check will indicate that the records do not exist. The court and other agencies
shall reply to any inquiry that no record exists on the matter. The person whose
record is expunged shall not have to disclose the fact of the record or any matter
relating thereto on an application for employment, credit, or other type of
application.
(3) If an unemancipated minor is improperly named as a defendant in a forcible
detainer action, that person, his or her parent or guardian, or any other
defendant named in the order may, at any time, petition the court to expunge the
name of the minor from the order. If the court finds that the person was an
unemancipated minor at the time the order was entered, the court shall expunge
the name of the minor. An expungement pursuant to this subsection shall be
effective immediately.
Section 2. KRS 383.250 is amended to read as follows:
The clerk of the court shall carefully preserve all papers, records, and proceedings[,]
relating to the cause[; and shall deliver, to any person requiring it, a transcript thereof].
The files and records of the court shall not be open to inspection by persons other than
Page 1 of 2
XXXX 2/10/2025 11:58 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 919
parties to such proceedings and their attorneys except under order of the court
expressly permitting inspection. Upon the entry of the final order in the case, the clerk
shall place all papers and records in the case in a suitable envelope which shall be
sealed and shall not be open for inspection without a written order of the court.
Page 2 of 2
XXXX 2/10/2025 11:58 AM Jacketed